Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.440

Withdrawal from medicaid program—Notice—Duties.

(1) If an assisted living facility voluntarily withdraws from participation in a state medicaid program for residential care and services under chapter 74.39A RCW, but continues to provide services of the type provided by assisted living facilities, the facility's voluntary withdrawal from participation is not an acceptable basis for the transfer or discharge of residents of the facility (a) who were receiving medicaid on the day before the effective date of the withdrawal; or (b) who have been paying the facility privately for at least two years and who become eligible for medicaid within one hundred eighty days of the date of withdrawal.

(2) An assisted living facility that has withdrawn from the state medicaid program for residential care and services under chapter 74.39A RCW must provide the following oral and written notices to prospective residents. The written notice must be prominent and must be written on a page that is separate from the other admission documents. The notice shall provide that:

(a) The facility will not participate in the medicaid program with respect to that resident; and

(b) The facility may transfer or discharge the resident from the facility for nonpayment, even if the resident becomes eligible for medicaid.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the medicaid contract under chapter 74.39A RCW that exists on the day the facility withdraws from medicaid participation is deemed to continue in effect as to the persons described in subsection (1) of this section for the purposes of:

(a) Department payments for the residential care and services provided to such persons;

(b) Maintaining compliance with all requirements of the medicaid contract between the department and the facility; and

(c) Ongoing inspection, contracting, and enforcement authority under the medicaid contract, regulations, and law.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this section shall not apply to a person who begins residence in a facility on or after the effective date of the facility's withdrawal from participation in the medicaid program for residential care and services.

(5) An assisted living facility that is providing residential care and services under chapter 74.39A RCW shall give the department and its residents sixty days' advance notice of the facility's intent to withdraw from participation in the medicaid program.

(6) Prior to admission to the facility, an assisted living facility participating in the state medicaid program for residential care and services under chapter 74.39A RCW must provide the following oral and written notices to prospective residents. The written notice must be prominent and must be written on a page that is separate from the other admission documents, and must provide that:

(a) In the future, the facility may choose to withdraw from participating in the medicaid program;

(b) If the facility withdraws from the medicaid program, it will continue to provide services to residents (i) who were receiving medicaid on the day before the effective date of the withdrawal; or (ii) who have been paying the facility privately for at least two years and who will become eligible for medicaid within one hundred eighty days of the date of withdrawal;

(c) After a facility withdraws from the medicaid program, it may transfer or discharge residents who do not meet the criteria described in this section for nonpayment, even if the resident becomes eligible for medicaid.

[ 2012 c 10 s 33; 2008 c 251 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective date—2008 c 251: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 28, 2008], except for *section 2 of this act which applies retroactively to September 1, 2007." [ 2008 c 251 s 3.]

*Reviser's note: Section 2 of this act was vetoed by the governor.